Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4628
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing the Uniform Deployed Parents Custody and Visitation Act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Laws 2015, LB219, § 28.